Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.220

Application to lesser judicial districts.

If the judge of the superior court in any judicial district having a total population of less than twenty-five thousand finds that the work in such district requires the services of an official court reporter he or she may appoint a person qualified under RCW 2.32.180.

[ 2011 c 336 s 53; 1957 c 244 s 3; 1951 c 210 s 2; 1945 c 24 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 42-3a.]